test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: kalsium
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: kalsium
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: kalsiumi
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: kalsiums
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: kalsiumið
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: kalsiumið
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: kalsiuminum
    kalsium+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: kalsiumsins
